src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/adj-comp_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator.gt.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser.gt.xfst
    App: lookup

# Comments after each adjective:
# ok = checked against 
# ? = not checked
# c = Comp or Superl attested in corpus

#Adjektives where lemma is compared.. Adjectives from lexicon NUORTTALABBO, GASSKALAMOS, OANEP, TJAVGGÁMUS

Tests:
  Adjective - gassagamos: # GASSKALAMOS

    gasskalamos+A+Attr: []
    gasskalamos+A+Attr: gasskalamos
    gasskalamos+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gasskalamos+A+Sg+Nom: gasskalamos
    gasskalamos+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    gasskalamos+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: gasskalabmusit
    gasskalamos+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: []
    gasskalamos+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []


  Adjective - guddnelabbo: # NUORTTALABBO
    guddnelabbo+A+Attr: [guddnelap, guddnelup]
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: guddnelamos
    guddnelabbo+A+Sg+Nom: guddnelabbo
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: guddnelamos
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guddnelappot
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guddnelabmusit
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: guddnelappusj
    guddnelabbo+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: guddnelapputjit
    guddnelabbo+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [guddnelapvuohta, guddnelupvuohta]

  Adjective - bajep: # OANEP
    bajep+A+Attr: bajep
    bajep+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: bajemus
    bajep+A+Sg+Nom: bajep
    bajep+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: bajemus
    bajep+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bajebut
    bajep+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bajemusát
    bajep+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: bajebusj
    bajep+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: bajebuttjat
    bajep+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: bajepvuohta
 
  Adjective - ienep: # OANEP
    ienep+A+Attr: [ienep, enáp]
    ienep+A+Der/Superl+A+Attr: [ienemus, enámus]
    ienep+A+Sg+Nom: [ienep, enáp]
    ienep+A+Der/Superl+A+Sg+Nom: [ienemus, enámus]
    ienep+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ienebut, enábut]
    ienep+A+Der/Superl+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ienemusát, enámusát]
    ienep+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: [ienebusj, enábusj]
    ienep+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: [ienebuttjat, enábuttjat]
    ienep+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: [ienepvuohta, enápvuohta] 

  Adjective - dájvvámus: # TJAVGGÁMUS
    dájvvámus+A+Attr: []
    dájvvámus+A+Attr: dájvvámus
    dájvvámus+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dájvvámus+A+Sg+Nom: dájvvámus
    dájvvámus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dájvvámus+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: dájvvámusát
    dájvvámus+A+Der/Dimin+A+Sg+Nom: []
    dájvvámus+A+Der/Dimin+A+Der/AAdv+Adv: []
    dájvvámus+A+Attr+Der/vuota+N+Sg+Nom: []
